third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fa_IR.dic
اخفا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
اشغال/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
افسونگرانه/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
افشاننده/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
افنباخ/z1b1z5j2j4j6j8y1
اقتدارعلی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
امامیه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
اماکن/z1b1y1
امکنه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
امیرمحمد/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
اندای/e1e2e3e4shzh
انزواگرا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
انقضا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
اکراه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6j8y1
اکوادور/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
ایروبیک/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
بارنمی‌گذاشته/e1e2sn
باریکی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
بازنمی‌آورد/sg
بازنمی‌رسان/sh
بازنگذارده/sn
بازگرداند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
بازگردید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
بازگفت/e1e2e3e4sgzg
بازگوی/e1e2e3e4shzh
باعرضه/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
بالفطره/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
بجنگید/sg
بخشای/e1e2e3e4shzh
بدمست/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
بر/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
برنشمار/sh
برنچیده/sn
برهمی‌گمارد/sg
بسمه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y1
بسیط/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
بشناسان/sh
بلندکننده/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
بلورچی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
بهار/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
بگوزید/sg!!
بیکرانگی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
تاثرانگیز/z1b1y1j1j3j7t1an
تاکتیک/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
تجاوز/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
ترساند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
ترکاند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
تفتیده/e1e2sn
تنگراه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6j8y1
تهور/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
توزین/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
توف/e1e2e3e4shzh
جراحتگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6j8y1
جغجغو/z2b3y1y3j1j3j7t1
جنبندگان/z1b1y1
جهانگشا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
جوانبخت/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
جوانمردانه/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
حایل/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
حلالی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
خاربارفروش/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
خاطری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
خسیس/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
خشکان/e1e2e3e4shzh
خوابستان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
دارخوینی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
داروسازی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
داعیگری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
دامداری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
درانید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
درمی‌افتاده/e1e2sn
درنوردید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
دشواری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
دو/e1e2e3e4shzh
دودگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6j8y1
دوستاری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
دوشید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
دژوان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
دیاموند/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
دیوصفتانه/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
ذروه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
راستگار/z1b1y1j1j3j7t1an
رستگارزاده/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
رماد/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
رودریگو/z1b4z4j1j3j5j7y1
ریگدار/z1b1y1j1j3j7t1an
زدود/e1e2e3e4sgzg
زولا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
سازا/z2b3y3j1j3j7t1
سترد/e1e2e3e4sgzg
سرگین‌دان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
سوریه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
سوزان/e1e2e3e4shzh
سوسیوبیولوژی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
سپوختن/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
سیری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
سیفون/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
سیماب/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
سینوژنیک/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
سینگر/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
شتابان/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
شته/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
شسته/e1e2sn
شور/e1e2e3e4shzh
صراطی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
عبدالریوف/z1b1z5j2j4j6j8y1
عزلتگاه/z1b4z5j1j2j4j6j8y1
غرامت/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
فاق/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
فراگرفته/e1e2sn
فرجاد/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
فروهمی‌گذار/sh
فلز/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
فهمیده/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
فیبا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
قاجاریه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
قاطرچی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
قاپید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
قاپیدن/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
قاید/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
قراگزلو/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
لابلای/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
لادیک/z1b1z5j2j4j6j8y1
ماورا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
متوافق/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
مراوده/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
مرکب/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
مسلول/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
معاندانه/z3b2hzj2j4j8t2
معظم/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
مقرر/z1b1y1j1j3j7t1an
ملوان/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
ملکشاه/z1b4z5j2j4j6j8y1
مویید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
مینوی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
نااطمینانی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
نابگاهی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
ناسا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
نامتوازن/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
نامساوی/z3b2y2j2j4j8t2
نامصمم/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
نانوا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
نتوفیده/sn
نرشت/sg
نسز/sh
نشلیده/sn
نوول/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
نپالای/sh
نگار/e1e2e3e4shzh
نگشت/sg
نیلگون/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
وارهانده/e1e2sn
وخیم/z1b1y1j1j2j3j4j7j8t1t2an
ورشوچی/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2
وزش/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
وینکو/z1b4z4j1j3j5j7y1
پاشانده/e1e2sn
پراکند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
پویید/e1e2e3e4sgzg
پوییدن/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
پیشدادی/z3b2y2j2j4j8t2
پیمایشگری/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2an
چاهو/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
چسبان/e1e2e3e4shzh
ژرفنگر/z1b1y1j1j3j7t1an
ژلاتین/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
ژوئیه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
کاترینا/z2b3z4j1j3j5j7y1y3
کش/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
کشان/e1e2e3e4shzh
کلاغ/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
کلمه/z3b2z5j2j4j6j8y2hz
کوثر/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1
کود/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
کوفت/e1e2e3e4sgzg
گریانده/e1e2sn
گستراند/e1e2e3e4sgzg
یشم/z1b1z4z5j1j2j3j4j5j6j7j8y1an
یورشگر/z1b1z4j1j3j5j7y1an
